en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components > Storage Devices: Disk Duplicators; Hard Drive Accessories; Hard Drive Arrays; Hard Drives; Network Storage Systems; Optical Drives; Solid State Drives; Tape Drives; USB Flash Drives
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty > Paměťová zařízení: Duplikátory disků; Pevné disky – příslušenství; Disková pole; Pevné disky; Systémy síťových úložišť; Optické jednotky; Pevné disky SSD; Páskové jednotky; USB flash disky
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件 > 儲存裝置: 磁碟拷貝機; 硬碟配件; 硬碟陣列; 硬碟; 網路儲存系統; 光碟機; 固態硬碟; 磁帶機; 隨身碟
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器 > ストレージデバイス: ディスクデュプリケーター; ストレージデバイス関連用品; ディスクアレイ; HDD; ネットワークストレージシステム; 光学ドライブ; ソリッドステートドライブ; テープドライブ; USBフラッシュドライブ
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính > Thiết bị lưu trữ: Bộ sao chép đĩa; Phụ kiện ổ cứng; Khay chứa ổ cứng; Ổ cứng; Hệ thống lưu trữ mạng máy tính; Ổ đĩa quang; Ổ đĩa rắn; Ổ băng; Ổ đĩa USB Flash
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten > Speichergeräte: Datenspeicher-Duplizierer; Festplattenzubehör; Disk-Arrays; Festplatten; Netzwerkspeichersysteme; Optische Laufwerke; Solid-State-Laufwerke; Bandlaufwerke; USB-Massenspeicher
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты > Запоминающие устройства: Дубликаторы дисков; Аксессуары для жестких дисков; Массивы жестких дисков; Жесткие диски; Сетевые системы хранения данных; Оптические диски; Твердотельные накопители; Ленточные накопители; Флеш-накопители USB
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera > Pamięci komputerowe: Duplikatory dysków; Akcesoria do dysków twardych; Macierze dyskowe; Dyski twarde; Sieciowe systemy pamięci; Napędy optyczne; Dyski SSD; Napędy taśmowe; Dyski USB Flash
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen > Opslagapparaten: Schijfduplicators; Accessoires voor harde schijven; Schijfarrays; Vaste schijven; Netwerkopslagsystemen; Optische stations; Solid state drives; Tapestations; USB-flashstations
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente > Pomnilniške naprave: Razmnoževalniki diskov; Dodatki za trde diske; Diskovna polja; Trdi diski; Omrežni sistemi za shranjevanje; Optični pogoni; SSD pogoni; Tračni pogoni; USB pomnilniške naprave
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente > Uređaji za pohranu podataka: Uređaj za dupliciranje diskova; Oprema za tvrdi disk; Nizovi za tvrde diskove; Tvrdi diskovi; Mrežni sustavi za pohranu podataka; Optički pogoni; Čvrsti pogon; Diskovi na traku; USB Flash Pogoni
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty > Úložné zariadenia: Duplikátory diskov; Príslušenstvo k pevným diskom; Polia pevných diskov; Pevné disky; Sieťové úložné systémy; Optické mechaniky; SSD disky; Páskové mechaniky; USB flash disky
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador > Dispositivos de armazenamento: Duplicadores de disco; Acessórios para unidades de armazenamento; Arrays de disco; Discos rígidos; Sistemas de armazenamento de rede; Drives ópticos; Unidades de estado sólido; Drives de fita; Flash Drives USB
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή > Συσκευές αποθήκευσης: Διατάξεις αντιγραφής δίσκων; Αξεσουάρ σκληρών δίσκων; Συστοιχίες σκληρών δίσκων; Σκληροί δίσκοι; Συστήματα αποθήκευσης δικτύου; Οπτικές συσκευές; Δίσκοι στερεάς κατάστασης; Οδηγοί μαγνητοταινίας; Οδηγοί USB
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter > Lagringsenheder: Diskduplikatorer; Harddisk – tilbehør; Diskenheder; Harddiske; Systemer til netværkslagring; Optiske drev; Solid state-drev; Bånddrev; USB-flashdrev
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件 > 存储设备: 磁盘拷贝机; 硬盘配件; 磁盘阵列; 硬盘驱动器; 网络存储系统; 光驱; 固态硬盘; 磁带驱动器; USB 闪存驱动器/U 盘
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품 > 스토리지 장치: 디스크 복제기; 하드 드라이브 부대용품; 하드 드라이브 어레이; 하드 드라이브; 네트워크 스토리지 장치; 광학 드라이브; 솔리드 스테이트 드라이브; 테이프 드라이브; USB 플래시 드라이브
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter > Lagringsenheter: Diskduplicerare; Tillbehör till lagringsenheter; Hårddiskklustrar; Hårddiskar; Nätverkslagringssystem; Optiska enheter; Solid state-hårddiskar; Bandenheter; USB-minnen
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare > Dispozitive de stocare: Dispozitive de copiere discuri; Accesorii pentru hard disk; Șiruri de hard disk-uri; Hard disk-uri; Sisteme de stocare în rețea; Unități optice; Unități solid state; Unități cu bandă; Unități USB flash
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти > Устройства за съхранение: Дубликатори на дискове; Аксесоари за твърд диск; Масиви за твърди дискове; Твърди дискове; Мрежови системи за съхранение; Оптични устройства; Полупроводникови дискови устройства; Лентови устройства; USB флаш устройства
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri > Depolama Aygıtları: Disk Çoğaltıcılar; Sabit Sürücü Aksesuarları; Sabit Sürücü Dizileri; Sabit Sürücüler; Ağ Depolama Sistemleri; Optik Sürücüler; Katı Hal Sürücüleri; Teyp Sürücüleri; USB Flash Diskler
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit > Tallennuslaitteet: Levyjen monistuslaitteet; Kovalevytarvikkeet; Kovalevyjärjestelmät; Kovalevyt; Verkkotallennusjärjestelmät; Optiset asemat; SSD-tallennuslaite; Kasettiasemat; USB-muistitikut
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer > Dispositivi archiviazione: Duplicatori di dischi; Accessori per dischi rigidi; Matrici dischi; Dischi rigidi; Sistemi di archiviazione di rete; Unità ottiche; Unità a stato solido; Unità nastro; Unità flash USB
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek > Tárolóeszközök: Lemezmásolók; Merevlemez-kiegészítők; Merevlemez-tömbök; Merevlemezek; Hálózati tárolórendszerek; Optikai meghajtók; SSD-meghajtók; Szalagos meghajtók; USB flash meghajtók
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur > Périphériques de stockage: Duplicateurs de disques; Accessoires pour disques durs; Baies de stockage; Disques durs; Systèmes de stockage en réseau; Lecteurs optiques; Disques SSD; Lecteurs de bande; Clés USB
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter > Oppbevaringsutstyr: Diskduplikatorer; Tilbehør til harddisker; Harddiskmatriser; Harddisker; Systemer for nettverkslagring; Optiske enheter; Solid state-disker; Kassettenheter; USB-flashenheter
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai > Laikmenos įrenginiai: Disko kopijavimo įrenginiai; Standžiųjų diskų priedai; Standžiųjų diskų masyvai; Standieji diskai; Tinklo saugojimo sistemos; Optiniai diskai; Kietosios būsenos diskai; Juostiniai kaupikliai; USB atmintinės
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์ > อุปกรณ์จัดเก็บข้อมูล: เครื่องทำสำเนาดิสก์; อุปกรณ์ฮาร์ดไดรฟ์; อาร์เรย์ฮาร์ดไดรฟ์; ฮาร์ดไดรฟ์; ระบบจัดเก็บเครือข่าย; ออปติคัลไดรฟ์; ฮาร์ดไดรฟ์ชนิดโซลิดสเตต; เทปไดรฟ์; แฟลชไดรฟ์ USB
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos > Dispositivos de armazenamento: Duplicadores de disco; Acessórios de disco rígido; Conjuntos de disco rígido; Discos rígidos; Sistemas de armazenamento de rede; Unidades óticas; Unidades de estado sólido; Unidades de fita; Pens USB
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras > Dispositivos de almacenamiento: Duplicadoras de disco; Accesorios para discos duros; Matrices de disco duro; Discos duros; Sistemas de almacenamiento de red; Unidades de disco óptico; Unidades de estado sólido; Unidades de cintas magnéticas; Memorias USB